North Dakota, session 69, SB2093.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision u of subsection 2 of section 57-38-30.3 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
u. Reduced by the amount of retired law enforcement personnel benefits received
by a taxpayer who has served a combined total of at least twenty years as a
peace officer or has medically retired from the taxpayer's duties as a peace
officer with a medical certificate due to a permanent mental or physical disability
that rendered the taxpayer unable to discharge the taxpayer's duties as a peace
officerqualified retired peace officer, including retired law enforcement personnel
benefits paid to the surviving spouse of a deceased qualified retired peace officer,
but only to the extent the amount was included in federal taxable income. For
purposes of this subdivision:
(1) "Peace officer" means a public servant authorized by law or by a
government agency or branch of the United States, a state, or a political
subdivision of a state to enforce the law and to conduct or engage in
investigations of violations of the law.
(2) "Qualified retired peace officer" means a peace officer who has:
(a) Served a combined total of at least twenty years as a peace officer; or
Page No. 1 25.0009.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(b) Medically retired from the peace officer's duties with a medical
certificate due to a permanent mental or physical disability that
rendered the peace officer unable to discharge the peace officer's
duties.
(2)(3) "Retired law enforcement personnel benefits" means retirement income
received by a taxpayerqualified retired peace officer or surviving spouse of a
deceased qualified retired peace officer who is eligible to receive retirement
income attributable to the taxpayer'squalified retired peace officer's
employment as a peace officer from a retirement plan maintained by or
through the employer from which the taxpayerqualified retired peace officer
retired as a peace officer.
SECTION 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICATION. This Act applies retroactively to taxable years
beginning after December 31, 2023.
Page No. 2 25.0009.02000